Hawaii statutes.
[§414E-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Acquiring person" means a person who
is required to deliver an information statement.

"Beneficial ownership" shall be
determined pursuant to section 13 of the federal Securities Exchange Act of
1934 and the rules adopted thereunder, as amended.

"Control share acquisition" means an
acquisition of shares of an issuing public corporation resulting in beneficial
ownership by an acquiring person of a new range of voting power specified in
this chapter, but does not include an acquisition:

(1) Before or pursuant to an agreement entered into
before July 1, 1987;

(2) By a donee pursuant to an inter vivos gift not
made to avoid this chapter or by a distributee as defined in chapter 560;

(3) Pursuant to a security agreement not created to
avoid this chapter;

(4) Pursuant to a merger or share exchange executed
in accordance with applicable law, if the issuing public corporation is a party
to the plan of merger or share exchange;

(5) From the issuing public corporation;

(6) That is approved by resolution of the board of
directors of the issuing public corporation before the acquisition occurs; or

(7) That the board of directors of the issuing public
corporation determines, by resolution before the acquisition occurs, is not a
control share acquisition.

"Issuing public corporation" means a
corporation incorporated in this State with at least one hundred shareholders
and having its principal place of business or substantial assets located in
this State. [L 2001, c 129, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next